Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-104
State banner; violations; penalty.

Any person, firm or corporation who shall violate any of the provisions of section 90-103, shall be deemed guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1925, c. 151, § 5, p. 388;

C.S.1929, § 84-724;

R.S.1943, § 84-716;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 339.